Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-767
Supplements and reissued volumes; certification; deposit of official copy; official version of statutes; use in courts.

The Revisor of Statutes shall certify that the contents of the supplements and reissued volumes, as published, are true copies of all laws of a general nature that are in force at the time of the publication thereof. The Revisor of Statutes shall deposit a copy of the supplements and reissued volumes so certified in the office of the Secretary of State. The supplements and reissued volumes shall constitute the official version of the statutes of Nebraska and may be cited as prima facie evidence of the law in all of the courts of this state.

Laws 1973, LB 1, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 8, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 1244, § 4.